Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB402.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 306(a), (c) and (d)(1) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, are amended to read:Section 306. Agricultural Lands Condemnation Approval 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Board.--(a) The Agricultural Lands Condemnation Approval Board is hereby created as an independent administrative board and shall be made up of six (6) members, consisting of the Director of the Office of Policy and Planning, or his designee, the Secretary of Agriculture, or his designee, the Secretary of Environmental [Resources] Protection, or his designee, the Secretary of Transportation, or his designee, and two active farmers appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of a majority of the Senate, for a term of four (4) years. The Secretary of Agriculture may select an alternate active farmer to serve in the absence of a farmer member of the board. An alternate active farmer shall serve for the appointed term of a farmer member of the board. A person may not serve as an alternate active farmer for more than one farmer member of the board. The Secretary of Agriculture shall be chairman of such [committee] board and shall convene the [committee] board from time to time as needed to carry out its duties. The [farm] farmer members of the [committee] board and alternate active farmers shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Such expenses and any others incurred by the [committee] board shall be paid for from appropriations made to the [Office of State Planning and Development] State Planning Board.* * *(c) The board shall have sixty (60) days in which to determine whether there is a feasible and prudent alternative to the condemnation. If the board determines that there is no feasible and prudent alternative, or if the board fails to act within sixty (60) days of receipt of the request, the requesting body may proceed to condemn; otherwise, the condemnation shall 20250HB0402PN0371 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not be effected. The failure of the chairman to convene a meeting of the board shall not constitute a failure to act on a condemnation request.(d) The board shall have jurisdiction over condemnation for the following purposes:(1) Highway purposes[, but not including activities relating to existing highways such as, but not limited to, widening roadways, the elimination of curves or reconstruction].* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0402PN0371 - 3 - 12345678910